California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 Government Code, respectively, or the application has been denied in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 485.

(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may destroy all examination materials two years following the date of an examination.

(i) If the examination specified by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4999.53 is not passed within seven years of an applicant for licensure’s initial attempt, the applicant shall obtain a passing score on the current version of the California law and ethics examination in order to be eligible to retake this examination.

(j) A passing score on the clinical examination shall be accepted by the board for a period of seven years from the date the examination
 was taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 76.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.53.

(a) Effective January 1, 2016, a registrant or an applicant for licensure as a professional clinical counselor shall pass the following examinations as prescribed by the board:

(1) A California law and ethics examination.

(2) A clinical examination administered by the board, or the National Clinical Mental Health Counselor Examination if the board finds that this examination meets the prevailing standards for validation and use of the licensing and certification tests in California.

(b) Upon registration with the board, an associate professional clinical counselor
 shall, within the first year of registration, take an examination on California law and ethics.

(c) A registrant or an applicant for licensure may take the clinical examination or the National Clinical Mental Health Counselor Examination, as established by the board through regulation, only upon meeting all of the following requirements:

(1) Completion of all required supervised work experience.

(2) Completion of all education requirements.

(3) Passage of the California law and ethics examination.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 19.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.55.

(a) Each applicant and registrant shall obtain a passing score on a board-administered California law and ethics examination in order to qualify for licensure.

(b) A registrant shall take a board-administered California law and ethics examination before their registration renewal.

(c) If an applicant fails the California law and ethics examination,
 they may retake the examination, upon payment of the required fees, without further application.

(d) The board shall not issue a subsequent registration number unless the applicant has passed the California law and ethics examination.

(e) A registrant shall complete a minimum of three hours of continuing education in the subject of California law and ethics during each renewal period in order to be eligible to renew their registration, regardless of whether or not they have passed the California law and ethics examination. The coursework shall be obtained from a board-accepted provider of continuing education, as specified in Section 4999.76.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 520, Sec. 13.   (AB 1759)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.60.

(a) The board may issue a license to a person who, at the time of submitting an application for a license pursuant to this chapter, holds a license in another jurisdiction of the United States as a professional clinical counselor at the highest level for independent clinical practice if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The applicant’s license in the other jurisdiction has been current, active, and unrestricted for at least two years immediately before the date the application was received by the board. The applicant shall disclose to the board for review any past restrictions or disciplinary action on an out-of-state license, and the board shall consider those
 actions in determining whether to issue a license to the applicant.

(2) The applicant’s degree that qualified the applicant for the out-of-state license is a master’s or doctoral degree that was obtained from an accredited or approved institution, as defined in Section 4999.12.

(3) The applicant complies with the fingerprint requirements established in Section 144.

(4) The applicant completes the coursework specified in subparagraphs (A) and (B) from an accredited or approved school, college, or university, as defined in Section 4999.12, or from a continuing education provider that is acceptable to the board, as defined in Section 4999.76. Undergraduate coursework shall not satisfy this requirement.

(A) A minimum of 12 hours of coursework in California law and professional ethics that includes, but is not limited to,
 instruction in advertising, scope of practice, scope of competence, treatment of minors, confidentiality, dangerous clients, psychotherapist-client privilege, recordkeeping, client access to records, state and federal laws relating to confidentiality of patient health information, dual relationships, child abuse, elder and dependent adult abuse, online therapy, insurance reimbursement, civil liability, disciplinary actions and unprofessional conduct, ethics complaints and ethical standards, termination of therapy, standards of care, relevant family law, therapist disclosures to clients, the application of legal and ethical standards in different types of work settings, and licensing law and licensing process.

(B) At least one semester unit, or 15 hours, of instruction that includes an understanding of various California cultures and
 the social and psychological implications of socioeconomic position.

(5) The applicant obtains a minimum of seven contact hours of training or coursework in child abuse assessment and reporting, as specified in Section 28, and any regulations promulgated thereunder.

(6) On and after January 1, 2021, the applicant shall show proof of completion of at least six hours of coursework or applied experience under supervision in suicide risk assessment and intervention using one of the methods specified in Section 4999.66.

(7) The applicant passes the board-administered California law and ethics examination specified in Section 4999.53. The clinical examination specified in Section 4999.53 shall be waived for an applicant
 qualifying under this section.

(b) This section was developed based on an examination of the licensure requirements for professional clinical counselors on a national level. This section shall not be construed to apply to any provisions under this division or Division 3 (commencing with Section 5000) other than this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 440, Sec. 5.   (AB 462)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.61.

(a) This section applies to persons with education gained from an out-of-state school or experience gained outside of California who apply for licensure or registration who do not qualify for a license under Section 4999.60.

(b) The board shall accept education gained from an out-of-state school for purposes of satisfying licensure or registration requirements if the education is substantially equivalent, as defined in Section 4999.62, and the applicant complies with subdivision (c) of Section 4999.40, if applicable.

(c) The board shall accept experience gained outside of California for purposes of satisfying licensure or
 registration requirements if the experience is substantially equivalent to the experience required by this chapter. If the applicant has fewer than 3,000 hours of qualifying supervised experience, the board shall accept as qualifying supervised experience the amount of time the applicant held an active license in good standing in another state or country as a professional clinical counselor at the highest level for independent clinical practice at a rate of 100 hours per month, up to a maximum of 1,200 hours.

(d) An applicant who obtained a license or registration in another state or country may qualify for licensure with the board without taking the clinical examination specified in Section 4999.53 if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The applicant obtained a passing
 score on the clinical licensing examination set forth in regulation as accepted by the board.

(2) The applicant’s license or registration in that state or country is active and in good standing at the time of the application and is not revoked, suspended, surrendered, denied, or otherwise restricted or encumbered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 380, Sec. 14.   (SB 679)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.62.

(a) This section applies to persons with education gained from an out-of-state school who apply for licensure or registration and who do not qualify for a license under Section 4999.60.

(b) For purposes of Section 4999.61, education is substantially equivalent if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The degree is obtained from an accredited or approved institution, as defined in Section 4999.12, and consists of, at a minimum, the following:

(A) (i) For an applicant who obtained a degree within the timeline prescribed by
 subdivision (a) of Section 4999.33 the degree shall contain no less than 60 graduate semester or 90 graduate quarter units of instruction.

(ii) Up to 12 semester or 18 quarter units of instruction may be remediated, if missing from the degree. The remediation may occur while the applicant is registered as an associate.

(B) For an applicant who obtained a degree within the timeline prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 4999.32 the degree shall contain no less than 48 graduate semester or 72 graduate quarter units of instruction.

(C) (i) Six semester or nine quarter units of supervised practicum or field study experience, including, but not limited to, a minimum of 280 hours of face-to-face
 supervised clinical experience counseling individuals, families, or groups.

(ii) An out-of-state applicant who holds a valid license in good standing in another state or country as a professional clinical counselor at the highest level for independent clinical practice is exempt from the practicum requirement specified in clause (i).

(D) The required areas of study listed in subparagraphs (A) to (M), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 4999.33.

(i) (I) An applicant whose degree is deficient in no more than six of the required areas of study listed in subparagraphs (A) to (M), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 4999.33 may satisfy those deficiencies by successfully
 completing graduate level coursework at an accredited or approved institution, as defined in Section 4999.12. Coursework taken to meet any deficiencies shall be the equivalent of three semester units or four quarter units of study.

(II) Notwithstanding subclause (I), no applicant shall be deficient in the required areas of study specified in subparagraph (E) or (G) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 4999.33.

(ii) An applicant who completed a course in professional orientation, ethics, and law in counseling as required by subparagraph (I) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 4999.33 that did not contain instruction in California law and ethics shall complete a 12-hour course in California law and professional ethics that includes, but is not limited to,
 instruction in advertising, scope of practice, scope of competence, treatment of minors, confidentiality, dangerous clients, psychotherapist-client privilege, recordkeeping, client access to records, state and federal laws relating to confidentiality of patient health information, dual relationships, child abuse, elder and dependent adult abuse, online therapy, insurance reimbursement, civil liability, disciplinary actions and unprofessional conduct, ethics complaints and ethical standards, termination of therapy, standards of care, relevant family law, therapist disclosures to clients, the application of legal and ethical standards in different types of work settings, and licensing law and the licensing process. The coursework may be from an accredited or approved school, college, or university, as defined in Section 4999.12, or from a continuing education provider that is acceptable to the board,
 as defined in Section 4999.76.
 Undergraduate coursework shall not satisfy this requirement. An applicant shall complete this coursework before registration as an associate.

(iii) An applicant who has not completed a course in professional orientation, ethics, and law in counseling as required by subparagraph (I) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 4999.33 shall complete this required coursework, including content in California law and ethics. An applicant shall complete this coursework before registration as an associate.

(iv) An applicant who holds a valid license in good standing in another state or country as a professional clinical counselor at the highest level for independent clinical practice may complete any units and course content requirements required in this subparagraph not
 already completed in the applicant’s education while registered as an associate, unless otherwise specified.

(2) The applicant completes any units required by subdivision (c) of Section 4999.33 not already completed in the applicant’s education as follows:

(A) At least 15 semester units or 22.5 quarter units of advanced coursework to develop knowledge of specific treatment issues or special populations. This coursework is in addition to the course requirements described in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1).

(B) Coursework shall be from an accredited or approved school, college, or university as defined in Section 4999.12.

(3) (A) The applicant
 completes the following coursework not already completed in the applicant’s education:

(i) A minimum of 10 contact hours of training in human sexuality, as specified in Section 25 and any regulations promulgated thereunder, including the study of the physiological, psychological, and social cultural variables associated with sexual behavior, gender identity, and the assessment and treatment of psychosexual dysfunction.

(ii) A minimum of 15 contact hours of instruction in spousal or partner abuse assessment, detection, intervention strategies, and same-gender abuse dynamics.

(iii) A minimum of seven contact hours of training or coursework in child abuse assessment and reporting as specified in Section 28 and any
 regulations promulgated thereunder.

(iv) A minimum of 10 contact hours of instruction in aging and long-term care, including biological, social, cognitive, and psychological aspects of aging. This coursework shall include instruction on the assessment and reporting of, as well as treatment related to, elder and dependent adult abuse and neglect.

(B) This coursework may be from an accredited or approved school, college, or university as defined in Section 4999.12, or from a continuing education provider that is described in Section 4999.76. Undergraduate coursework shall not satisfy this requirement.

(4) The applicant completes the following coursework not already completed in the applicant’s education from an accredited or
 approved school, college, or university as defined in Section 4999.12, or from a continuing education provider that is described in Section 4999.76. Undergraduate coursework shall not satisfy this requirement.

(A) At least three semester units, or 45 hours, of instruction regarding the principles of mental health recovery-oriented care and methods of service delivery in recovery-oriented practice environments, including structured meetings with various consumers and family members of consumers of mental health services to enhance understanding of their experiences of mental illness, treatment, and recovery.

(B) At least one semester unit, or 15 hours, of instruction that includes an understanding of various California cultures and the social and psychological implications of
 socioeconomic position.

(5) An applicant may complete any units and course content requirements required under paragraph (2), (3), or (4) not already completed in the applicant’s education while registered with the board as an associate.

(6) On and after January 1, 2021, an applicant for licensure shall show proof of completion of at least six hours of coursework or applied experience under supervision in suicide risk assessment and intervention using one of the methods specified in Section 4999.66.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 380, Sec. 15.   (SB 679)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.64.

(a) Effective January 1, 2016, an applicant who fails the examination specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4999.53 may, within one year from the notification date of that failure, retake the examination as regularly scheduled without further application upon payment of the fee for the examination. Thereafter, the applicant shall not be eligible for further examination until he or she files a new application, meets all requirements in effect on the date of application, and pays all required fees.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 473, Sec. 64.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section initially operative January 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.66.

(a) On or after January 1, 2021, an applicant for licensure as a professional clinical counselor shall show, as part of the application, that they have completed a minimum of six hours of coursework or applied experience under supervision in suicide risk assessment and intervention. This requirement shall be met in one of the following ways:

(1) Obtained as part of their qualifying graduate degree program. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a written certification from the registrar or training director of the educational institution or program from which the applicant graduated stating that the coursework required by this section is included
 within the institution’s curriculum required for graduation at the time the applicant graduated, or within the coursework that was completed by the applicant.

(2) Obtained as part of their applied experience. Applied experience can be met in any of the following settings: practicum or associateship that meets the requirement of this chapter, formal postdoctoral placement that meets the requirements of Section 2911, or other qualifying supervised experience. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a written certification from the director of training for the program or primary supervisor where the qualifying experience has occurred stating that the training required by this section is included within the applied experience.

(3) By taking a continuing
 education course that meets the requirements of Section 4999.76. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a certification of completion.

(b) As a one-time requirement, a licensee prior to the time of their first renewal after January 1, 2021, or an applicant for reactivation or reinstatement to an active license status on or after January 1, 2021, shall have completed a minimum of six hours of coursework or applied experience under supervision in suicide risk assessment and intervention, using one of the methods specified in subdivision (a). Proof of compliance with this section shall be certified under penalty of perjury that they are in compliance with this section and shall be retained for submission to the board upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 33.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.67.

(a) On or after July 1, 2023, an applicant for licensure as a professional clinical counselor shall show, as part of the application, that they have completed a minimum of three hours of training or coursework in the provision of mental health services via telehealth, which shall include law and ethics related to telehealth. This requirement shall be met in one of the following ways:

(1) Obtained as part of their qualifying graduate degree program. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a written certification from the registrar or training director of the educational institution or program from which the applicant graduated stating that the coursework required by this section is included within the institution’s
 curriculum required for graduation at the time the applicant graduated, or within the coursework that was completed by the applicant.

(2) Obtained by completing a continuing education course that meets the requirements of Section 4999.76. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a certification of completion.

(b) As a one-time requirement, a licensee before the time of their first renewal after July 1, 2023, or an applicant for reactivation or reinstatement to an active license status on or after July 1, 2023, shall have completed a minimum of three hours of training or coursework in the provision of mental health services via telehealth, which shall include law and ethics related to telehealth, using one of the methods specified in subdivision (a).

(c) Proof of compliance with subdivision
 (b) shall be certified under penalty of perjury that they are in compliance with this section and shall be retained for submission to the board upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 520, Sec. 14.   (AB 1759)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Practice Requirements [4999.70. - 4999.76.]

4999.70.

A licensee shall display their license in a conspicuous place in the licensee’s primary place of practice when rendering professional clinical services in person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 160, Sec. 17.   (SB 1024)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.71.

(a) A licensee or registrant shall provide a client with a notice written in at least 12-point type prior to initiating psychotherapy services, or as soon as practicably possible thereafter, that reads as follows: 

NOTICE TO CLIENTS

The Board of Behavioral Sciences receives and responds to complaints regarding services provided within the scope of practice of professional clinical counselors. You may contact the board online at www.bbs.ca.gov, or by calling (916) 574-7830.

(b) On and after July 1,
 2025, upon initiation of psychotherapy services with a client, the notice described in subdivision (a) shall also include the licensee’s or registrant’s full name as filed with the board, the license or registration number, the type of license or registration, and the license or registration expiration date. 

(c) Delivery of the notice required by this section to the client shall be documented.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 160, Sec. 18.   (SB 1024)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.72.

Any licensed professional clinical counselor who owns a business using a fictitious business name shall not use any name that is false, misleading, or deceptive, and shall inform the patient, prior to the commencement of treatment, of the name and license designation of the owner or owners of the practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 747, Sec. 26.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.74.

Licensed professional clinical counselors shall provide to each client accurate information about the counseling relationship and the counseling process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 619, Sec. 3.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.75.

(a) A licensed professional clinical counselor shall retain a client’s or patient’s health service records for a minimum of seven years from the date therapy is terminated. If the client or patient is a minor, the client’s or patient’s health service records shall be retained for a minimum of seven years from the date the client or patient reaches 18 years of age. Health service records may be retained in either a written or an electronic format.

(b) This section shall apply only to the records of a client or patient whose therapy is terminated on or after January 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 312, Sec. 4.   (SB 578)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.76.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (d), the board shall not renew any license pursuant to this chapter unless the applicant certifies to the board, on a form prescribed by the board, that the applicant has completed not less than 36 hours of approved continuing education in or relevant to the field of professional clinical counseling in the preceding two years, as determined by the board.

(2) The board shall not renew any registration pursuant to this chapter unless the registrant certifies under penalty of perjury to the board, and on a form
 prescribed by the board, that they have completed not less than three hours of continuing education in the subject of California law and ethics during the preceding year.

(b) (1) In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course in menopausal mental health.

(2) In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course in maternal mental health.

(c) The board shall have the right to audit the records of any applicant to verify the completion of the continuing education requirement. Applicants shall maintain records of completed continuing education coursework for a minimum of two years and shall make these records available to the board for auditing purposes upon request.

(d) The board may establish exceptions from the continuing education requirement of this section for good cause, as defined by the board.

(e) The continuing education shall be obtained from one of the following sources:

(1) A school, college, or university that is accredited or approved, as defined in Section 4999.12. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed as requiring coursework to be offered as part of a regular degree program.

(2) Other continuing education providers as specified by the board by regulation.

(f) The board shall establish, by regulation, a procedure for identifying acceptable providers of continuing education courses, and all providers of continuing education, as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (e), shall adhere to procedures established by the board. The board may revoke or deny the right of a provider to offer continuing education coursework pursuant to this section for failure to comply with this section or any regulation adopted pursuant to this section.

(g) Training, education, and coursework by approved providers shall incorporate one or more of the following:

(1) Aspects of the discipline that are fundamental to the understanding or the practice of professional clinical counseling.

(2) Significant recent developments in the discipline of professional clinical counseling.

(3) Aspects of other disciplines that enhance the understanding or the practice of professional clinical counseling.

(h) A system of continuing education for licensed professional clinical counselors shall include courses directly related to the diagnosis, assessment, and treatment of the client population being served.

(i) The continuing education requirements of this section shall fully comply with the guidelines for mandatory continuing education established by the Department of Consumer Affairs pursuant to Section 166.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 836, Sec. 7.5.   (AB 2581)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Enforcement [4999.80. - 4999.92.]

4999.80.

In order to carry out the provisions of this chapter, the board shall do all of the following:

(a) Enforce laws designed to protect the public from incompetent, unethical, or unprofessional practitioners.

(b) Investigate complaints concerning the conduct of any licensed professional clinical counselor.

(c) Revoke, suspend, or fail to renew a license that it has authority to issue for just cause, as enumerated in rules and regulations of the board. The board may deny, suspend, or revoke any license granted under this chapter pursuant to Section 480, 481, 484, 490, 496, 498, or 499.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 68.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.82.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in any of the following acts:

(a) Engage in the practice of professional clinical counseling, as defined in Section 4999.20, without first having complied with the provisions of this chapter and without holding a valid license as required by this chapter.

(b) Represent himself or herself by the title “licensed professional clinical counselor,” “LPCC,” “licensed clinical counselor,” or “professional clinical counselor” without being duly licensed according to the provisions of this chapter.

(c) Make any use of any title, words, letters, or abbreviations, that may reasonably be confused with
 a designation provided by this chapter to denote a standard of professional or occupational competence without being duly licensed.

(d) Materially refuse to furnish the board information or records required or requested pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 619, Sec. 3.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.84.

It is the intent of the Legislature that any communication made by a person to a licensed professional clinical counselor in the course of professional services shall be deemed a privileged communication.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 619, Sec. 3.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.86.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 619, Sec. 3.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.88.

In addition to other proceedings provided in this chapter, whenever any person has engaged, or is about to engage, in any acts or practices that constitute, or will constitute, an offense against this chapter, the superior court in and for the county wherein the acts or practices take place, or are about to take place, may issue an injunction, or other appropriate order, restraining that conduct on application of the board, the Attorney General, or the district attorney of the county.

The proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 619, Sec. 3.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.90.

The board may refuse to issue any registration or license, or may suspend or revoke the registration or license of any associate or licensed professional clinical counselor, if the applicant, licensee, or registrant has been guilty of unprofessional conduct. Unprofessional conduct includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) The conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee or registrant under this chapter. The record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence only of the fact that the conviction occurred. The board may inquire into the circumstances surrounding the commission of the crime in order to fix the degree of discipline or to determine
 if the conviction is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee or registrant under this chapter. A conviction has the same meaning as defined in Section 7.5. The board may order any license or registration suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license or registration when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or, when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence. All actions pursuant to this subdivision shall be taken pursuant to Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(b) Securing a license or registration by fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation on any application for licensure or registration submitted to the board, whether engaged in by an applicant for a license or registration, or by a licensee in
 support of any application for licensure or registration.

(c) Administering to themself any controlled substance or using any of the dangerous drugs specified in Section 4022, or any alcoholic beverage to the extent, or in a manner, as to be dangerous or injurious to the person applying for a registration or license or holding a registration or license under this chapter, or to any other person, or to the public, or, to the extent that the use impairs the ability of the person applying for or holding a registration or license to conduct with safety to the public the practice authorized by the registration or license. The board shall deny an application for a registration or license or revoke the license or registration of any person, other than one who is licensed as a physician and surgeon, who uses or offers to use drugs in the
 course of performing licensed professional clinical counseling services.

(d) Gross negligence or incompetence in the performance of licensed professional clinical counseling services.

(e) Violating, attempting to violate, or conspiring to violate any of the provisions of this chapter or any regulation adopted by the board.

(f) Misrepresentation as to the type or status of a license or registration held by the person, or otherwise misrepresenting or permitting misrepresentation of the licensee’s or registrant’s education, professional qualifications, or professional affiliations to any person or entity.

(g) Impersonation of another by any licensee, registrant, or applicant
 for a license or registration, or, in the case of a licensee or registrant, allowing any other person to use the licensee’s or registrant’s license or registration.

(h) Aiding or abetting, or employing, directly or indirectly, any unlicensed or unregistered person to engage in conduct for which a license or registration is required under this chapter.

(i) Intentionally or recklessly causing physical or emotional harm to any client.

(j) The commission of any dishonest, corrupt, or fraudulent act substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee or registrant.

(k) Engaging in sexual relations with a client, or a former client within
 two years following termination of therapy, soliciting sexual relations with a client, or committing an act of sexual abuse, or sexual misconduct with a client, or committing an act punishable as a sexually related crime, if that act or solicitation is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensed professional clinical counselor.

(l) Performing, or holding oneself out as being able to perform, or offering to perform, or permitting any trainee, applicant, or registrant under supervision to perform, any professional services beyond the scope of the license authorized by this chapter.

(m) Failure to maintain confidentiality, except as otherwise required or permitted by law, of all information that has been received from a client in confidence during the
 course of treatment and all information about the client which is obtained from tests or other means.

(n) Prior to the commencement of treatment, failing to disclose to the client or prospective client the fee to be charged for the professional services, or the basis upon which that fee will be computed.

(o) Paying, accepting, or soliciting any consideration, compensation, or remuneration, whether monetary or otherwise, for the referral of professional clients. All consideration, compensation, or remuneration shall be in relation to professional clinical counseling services actually provided by the licensee. This subdivision does not prevent collaboration among two or more licensees in a case or cases. However, no fee shall be charged for that collaboration, except when
 disclosure of the fee has been made in compliance with subdivision (n).

(p) Advertising in a manner that is false, fraudulent, misleading, or deceptive, as defined in Section 651.

(q) Reproduction or description in public, or in any publication subject to general public distribution, of any psychological test or other assessment device, the value of which depends in whole or in part on the naivete of the subject, in ways that might invalidate the test or device.

(r) Any conduct in the supervision of a registered associate, trainee, or applicant by any licensee that violates this chapter or any rules or regulations adopted by the board.

(s) Performing or
 holding oneself out as being able to perform mental health services beyond the scope of one’s competence, as established by one’s education, training, or experience. This subdivision shall not be construed to expand the scope of the license authorized by this chapter.

(t) Permitting a trainee, associate, or applicant under one’s supervision or control to perform, or permitting the trainee, associate, or applicant to hold themself out as competent to perform, mental health services beyond the trainee’s, associate’s, or applicant’s level of education, training, or experience.

(u) The violation of any statute or regulation governing the gaining and supervision of experience required by this chapter.

(v) Failure to keep
 records consistent with sound clinical judgment, the standards of the profession, and the nature of the services being rendered.

(w) Failure to comply with the child abuse reporting requirements of Section 11166 of the Penal Code.

(x) Failing to comply with the elder and dependent adult abuse reporting requirements of Section 15630 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(y) Repeated acts of negligence.

(z) (1) Engaging in an act described in Section 261, 286, 287, or 289 of, or former Section 288a of, the Penal Code with a minor or an act described in Section 288 or 288.5 of the Penal Code regardless of whether the act occurred prior to
 or after the time the registration or license was issued by the board. An act described in this subdivision occurring prior to the effective date of this subdivision shall constitute unprofessional conduct and shall subject the licensee to refusal, suspension, or revocation of a license under this section.

(2) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that protection of the public, and in particular minors, from sexual misconduct by a licensee is a compelling governmental interest, and that the ability to suspend or revoke a license for sexual conduct with a minor occurring prior to the effective date of this section is equally important to protecting the public as is the ability to refuse a license for sexual conduct with a minor occurring prior to the effective date of this section.

(aa) Engaging in any conduct that subverts or attempts to subvert any licensing examination or the administration of an examination as described in Section 123.
